test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-lex_ceppi_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - kukke: # 
    kukke+A+Attr: kuhes
    kukke+A+Sg+Nom: kukke
    kukke+A+Sg+Gen: kuhe
    kukke+A+Sg+Ill: kukán
    kukke+A+Sg+Loc: kuhest
    kukke+A+Sg+Com: kuhhijn
    kukke+A+Sg+Abe: kuhettáá
    kukke+A+Ess: kukken
    kukke+A+Par: kukked
    kukke+A+Pl+Nom: kuheh
    kukke+A+Pl+Gen: kuhij
    kukke+A+Pl+Acc: kuhijd
    kukke+A+Pl+Ill: kuhhijd
    kukke+A+Pl+Loc: kuhijn
    kukke+A+Pl+Com: kuhijguin
    kukke+A+Pl+Abe: kuhijttáá

    kukke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kuhheb
    kukke+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: kuhheb
    kukke+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: kuhhebân
    kukke+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: kuhhebist
    kukke+A+Comp+Sg+Com: kuhhebáin
    kukke+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: kuhhebttáá
    kukke+A+Comp+Ess: kuhhebin
    kukke+A+Comp+Par: kuhhebid
    kukke+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: kuhhebeh
    kukke+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: kuhhebij
    kukke+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: kuhhebijd
    kukke+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: kuhhebáid
    kukke+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: kuhhebijn
    kukke+A+Comp+Pl+Com: kuhhebijguin
    kukke+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: kuhhebijttáá

    kukke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kuhemus
    kukke+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: kuhemuu
    kukke+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: kuhemui
    kukke+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: kuhemuust
    kukke+A+Superl+Sg+Com: kuhemuin
    kukke+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: kuhemuuttáá
    kukke+A+Superl+Ess: kuhemussân
    kukke+A+Superl+Par: kuhemussâd
    kukke+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: [kuhemusah, kuhemuuh]
    kukke+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: kuhemui
    kukke+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: kuhemuid
    kukke+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: kuhemuid
    kukke+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: kuhemuin
    kukke+A+Superl+Pl+Com: kuhemuiguin
    kukke+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: kuhemuittáá

  Adjective - čeppi: # 
    čeppi+A+Attr: čepis
    čeppi+A+Sg+Nom: čeppi
    čeppi+A+Sg+Gen: čeepi
    čeppi+A+Sg+Ill: čiäpán
    čeppi+A+Sg+Loc: čeepist
    čeppi+A+Sg+Com: čeppijn
    čeppi+A+Sg+Abe: čepittáá
    čeppi+A+Ess: čeppin
    čeppi+A+Par: čeppid
    čeppi+A+Pl+Nom: čeepih
    čeppi+A+Pl+Gen: [čepij, čeepij]
    čeppi+A+Pl+Acc: čeepijd
    čeppi+A+Pl+Ill: čeppijd
    čeppi+A+Pl+Loc: čeepijn
    čeppi+A+Pl+Com: čepijguin
    čeppi+A+Pl+Abe: čepijttáá

    čeppi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: čeppib
    čeppi+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: čeppib
    čeppi+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: čeppibân
    čeppi+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: čeppibist
    čeppi+A+Comp+Sg+Com: čeppibáin
    čeppi+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: čeppibttáá
    čeppi+A+Comp+Ess: čeppibin
    čeppi+A+Comp+Par: čeppibid
    čeppi+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: čeppibeh
    čeppi+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: čeppibij
    čeppi+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: čeppibijd
    čeppi+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: čeppibáid
    čeppi+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: čeppibijn
    čeppi+A+Comp+Pl+Com: čeppibijguin
    čeppi+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: čeppibijttáá

    čeppi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: čepimus
    čeppi+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: čepimuu
    čeppi+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: čepimui
    čeppi+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: čepimuust
    čeppi+A+Superl+Sg+Com: čepimuin
    čeppi+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: čepimuuttáá
    čeppi+A+Superl+Ess: čepimussân
    čeppi+A+Superl+Par: čepimussâd
    čeppi+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: [čepimusah, čepimuuh]
    čeppi+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: čepimui
    čeppi+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: čepimuid
    čeppi+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: čepimuid
    čeppi+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: čepimuin
    čeppi+A+Superl+Pl+Com: čepimuiguin
    čeppi+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: čepimuittáá
